src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON 284K2
 +Inf:%>ee # ;
 +Inf:%>ea # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>eer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>eas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ei # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ei # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>een # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ei # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ene # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ene # ;
 +Adj:%>eande # ;
 +Imp:%>e # ;

LEXICON 284KL
 +Inf:%>ee # ;
 +Inf:%>ea # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>eer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>east # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ei # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ei # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>een # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ei # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ene # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ene # ;
 +Adj:%>eande # ;
 +Imp:%>e # ;

LEXICON 285
 +Inf:%>ee # ;
 +Inf:%>ea # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>e # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>east # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ee # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ee # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>een # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ene # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ene # ;
 +Adj:%>eande # ;
 +Imp:%>e # ;

LEXICON 285K1
 +Inf:%>ee # ;
 +Inf:%>ea # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>e # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>eas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ee # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ee # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>een # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ei # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ene # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ene # ;
 +Adj:%>eande # ;
 +Imp:%>e # ;

LEXICON 285K2
 +Inf:%>ee # ;
 +Inf:%>ea # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>eer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>eas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ee # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ee # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>een # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ei # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ene # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ene # ;
 +Adj:%>eande # ;
 +Imp:%>e # ;

LEXICON 285KL
 +Inf:%>ee # ;
 +Inf:%>ea # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>eer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>east # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ee # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ee # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>een # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ei # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ene # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ene # ;
 +Adj:%>eande # ;
 +Imp:%>e # ;

LEXICON 286
 +Inf:%>itje # ;
 +Inf:%>itja # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>it # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>itjast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>at # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>eti # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>eti # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>eten # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>eti # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>etne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>etne # ;
 +Adj:%>itjande # ;
 +Imp:%>it # ;

LEXICON 286K1
 +Inf:%>itje # ;
 +Inf:%>itja # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>it # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>itjas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>at # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>eti # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>eti # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>eten # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>eti # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>etne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>etne # ;
 +Adj:%>itjande # ;
 +Imp:%>it # ;

LEXICON 286K2
 +Inf:%>itje # ;
 +Inf:%>itja # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>iter # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>itjas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>at # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>eti # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>eti # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>eten # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>eti # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>etne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>etne # ;
 +Adj:%>itjande # ;
 +Imp:%>it # ;

LEXICON 286KL
 +Inf:%>itje # ;
 +Inf:%>itja # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>iter # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>itjast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>at # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>eti # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>eti # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>eten # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>eti # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>etne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>etne # ;
 +Adj:%>itjande # ;
 +Imp:%>it # ;

LEXICON 287
 +Inf:%>itje # ;
 +Inf:%>itja # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>it # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>itjast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>at # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ete # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ete # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>eten # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>etne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>etne # ;
 +Adj:%>itjande # ;
 +Imp:%>it # ;

LEXICON 287K1
 +Inf:%>itje # ;
 +Inf:%>itja # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>it # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>itjas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>at # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ete # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ete # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>eten # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>eti # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>etne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>etne # ;
 +Adj:%>itjande # ;
 +Imp:%>it # ;

LEXICON 287K2
 +Inf:%>itje # ;
 +Inf:%>itja # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>itter # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>itjas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>at # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ete # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ete # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>eten # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>eti # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>etne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>etne # ;
 +Adj:%>itjande # ;
 +Imp:%>it # ;

LEXICON 287KL
 +Inf:%>itje # ;
 +Inf:%>itja # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>itter # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>itjast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>at # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ete # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ete # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>eten # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>eti # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>etne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>etne # ;
 +Adj:%>itjande # ;
 +Imp:%>it # ;

LEXICON 289
 +Inf:%>henge # ;
 +Inf:%>henga # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>heng # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>hengast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>hang # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>hange # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>hange # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>hangen # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>hangne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>hangne # ;
 +Adj:%>hengande # ;
 +Imp:%>heng # ;

LEXICON 289K1
 +Inf:%>henge # ;
 +Inf:%>henga # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>heng # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>hengas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>hang # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>hange # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>hange # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>hangen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>hangi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>hangne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>hangne # ;
 +Adj:%>hengande # ;
 +Imp:%>heng # ;

LEXICON 289K2
 +Inf:%>henge # ;
 +Inf:%>henga # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>henger # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>hengas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>hang # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>hange # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>hange # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>hangen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>hangi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>hangne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>hangne # ;
 +Adj:%>hengande # ;
 +Imp:%>heng # ;

LEXICON 289KL
 +Inf:%>henge # ;
 +Inf:%>henga # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>henger # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>hengast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>hang # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>hange # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>hange # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>hangen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>hangi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>hangne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>hangne # ;
 +Adj:%>hengande # ;
 +Imp:%>heng # ;

LEXICON 28A
 +Inf:%>itje # ;
 +Inf:%>itja # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>it # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>itjast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>at # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ete # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ete # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>eten # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>eti # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>etne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>etne # ;
 +Adj:%>itjande # ;
 +Imp:%>it # ;

LEXICON 28AK1
 +Inf:%>itje # ;
 +Inf:%>itja # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>it # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>itjas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>at # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ete # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ete # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>eten # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>eti # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>etne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>etne # ;
 +Adj:%>itjande # ;
 +Imp:%>it # ;

LEXICON 28AK2
 +Inf:%>itje # ;
 +Inf:%>itja # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>itt # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>itjas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>at # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ete # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ete # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>eten # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>eti # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>etne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>etne # ;
 +Adj:%>itjande # ;
 +Imp:%>it # ;

LEXICON 28AKL
 +Inf:%>itje # ;
 +Inf:%>itja # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>itt # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>itjast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>at # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ete # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ete # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>eten # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>eti # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>etne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>etne # ;
 +Adj:%>itjande # ;
 +Imp:%>it # ;

LEXICON 290
 +Inf:%>henge # ;
 +Inf:%>henga # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>heng # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>hengast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>hekk # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>hangi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>hangi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>hangen # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>hangne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>hangne # ;
 +Adj:%>hengande # ;
 +Imp:%>heng # ;

LEXICON 290K1
 +Inf:%>henge # ;
 +Inf:%>henga # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>heng # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>hengas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>hekk # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>hangi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>hangi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>hangen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>hangi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>hangne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>hangne # ;
 +Adj:%>hengande # ;
 +Imp:%>heng # ;

LEXICON 290K2
 +Inf:%>henge # ;
 +Inf:%>henga # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>henger # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>hengas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>hekk # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>hangi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>hangi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>hangen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>hangi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>hangne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>hangne # ;
 +Adj:%>hengande # ;
 +Imp:%>heng # ;

LEXICON 290KL
 +Inf:%>henge # ;
 +Inf:%>henga # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>henger # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>hengast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>hekk # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>hangi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>hangi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>hangen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>hangi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>hangne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>hangne # ;
 +Adj:%>hengande # ;
 +Imp:%>heng # ;

LEXICON 291
 +Inf:%>henge # ;
 +Inf:%>henga # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>heng # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>hengast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>hekk # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>hange # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>hange # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>hangen # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>hangne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>hangne # ;
 +Adj:%>hengande # ;
 +Imp:%>heng # ;
