src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot
avhenge+V:avh 289 ; ! LEMMA_ID=4169
avvege+V:avv 285 ; ! LEMMA_ID=4744
henge+V:h 289 ; ! LEMMA_ID=35155
sitje+V:s 287 ; ! LEMMA_ID=80176
vege+V:v 285 ; ! LEMMA_ID=108563
oversitje+V:overs 287 ; ! LEMMA_ID=132769
